Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 9 Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility

Chapter constitutional. —

In view of the almost unanimous decisions in state courts upholding financial responsibility laws like Wyoming's and in the absence of any authority to contradict what was said in Reitz v. Mealey, 314 U.S. 33, 62 S. Ct. 24, 86 L. Ed. 21, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 1146 (1941), that financial responsibility acts of states are a valid exercise of the police powers of a state, an appellant cannot claim to make a clear showing of unconstitutionality with respect to this chapter. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Hearing before division not essential for due process. —

The legislature has not seen fit to require a hearing before the superintendent (now division) under this chapter. Such a provision is not essential for due process in the proceedings. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Chapter establishes limits of liability. —

In Wyoming, the “limits of liability required by law” are established by this chapter. Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1997).

Chapter penal in nature and strictly construed. —

This chapter is a penal statute. The rule of strict construction therefore applies. Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1950).

Cited

in

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Irvine, 589 P.2d 1295,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Administration of the Wyoming Financial Responsibility Act,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 84.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 190 to 198.

Joinder of insurer and insured under policy of compulsory indemnity or liability insurance in action by injured third person, 20 ALR2d 1097.

Liability of insurer, under compulsory statutory vehicle liability policy, to injured third persons, notwithstanding insured's failure to comply with policy conditions, as measured by policy limits or by limits of financial responsibility act, 29 ALR2d 817.

Failure to give notice or other lack of cooperation by insured as defense to action against compulsory liability insurer by injured member of the public, 31 ALR2d 645.

Constitutionality of statute which makes proof of financial responsibility condition of granting registration or license, 35 ALR2d 1011; 2 ALR5th 725.

Rescission or avoidance, for fraud or misrepresentation, of compulsory, financial responsibility or assigned risk automobile insurance, 83 ALR2d 1104.

Governmental vehicles or their operators, 87 ALR2d 1224.

Operator's liability policy issued in compliance with financial responsibility statute, 88 ALR2d 995.

Policy provision extending coverage to comply with financial responsibility act as applicable to insured's first accident, 8 ALR3d 388.

Extraterritorial application of statute permitting injured person to maintain direct action against tortfeasor's automobile liability insurer, 83 ALR3d 338.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles § 223.